Maryland, session 2025, HB0622.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–8A–14.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Custodial interrogation” retains its judicially determined meaning.
(3) (i) “Law enforcement officer” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of
the Public Safety Article.
(ii) “Law enforcement officer” includes a school resource officer, as
defined in § 7–1501 of the Education Article.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0622*

HOUSE BILL 622
(b) A law enforcement officer may not conduct a custodial interrogation of a child
until:
(1) The child has consulted with an attorney who is:
(i) Retained by the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child; or
(ii) Provided by the Office of the Public Defender; and
(2) The law enforcement officer has made an effort reasonably calculated
to give actual notice to the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child that the child will be
interrogated.
(c) A consultation with an attorney under this section:
(1) Shall be:
(i) Conducted in a manner consistent with the Maryland Rules of
Professional Conduct; and
(ii) Confidential; and
(2) May be:
(i) In person; or
(ii) By telephone or video conference.
(d) To the extent practicable and consistent with the Maryland Rules of
Professional Conduct, an attorney providing consultation under this section shall
communicate and coordinate with the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child in custody.
(e) The requirement of consultation with an attorney under this section:
(1) May not be waived; and
(2) Applies regardless of whether the child is proceeded against as a child
under this subtitle or is charged as an adult.
(f) (1) A law enforcement agency conducting an interrogation under this
section shall maintain a record of the notification or attempted notification of a parent,
guardian, or custodian under this section, including:
(i) A signed statement by a duly authorized law enforcement officer
employed by the agency that an attempt to notify a parent, guardian, or custodian was
made;

HOUSE BILL 622 3
(ii) The name of the person sought to be notified; and
(iii) The method of attempted notification.
(2) (i) A law enforcement agency conducting an interrogation under
this section shall maintain a record of the name of the attorney contacted and the county
or counties in which the attorney provided the consultation.
(ii) An attorney contacted to provide legal consultation to a child
under this subtitle shall provide to a law enforcement officer the information required for
the record required to be maintained under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(g) (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, a law enforcement
officer may conduct an otherwise lawful custodial interrogation of a child if:
(i) 1. The law enforcement officer reasonably believes that the
information sought is necessary to protect against a threat to public safety; and
[(ii)] 2. The questions posed to the child by the law enforcement
officer are limited to those questions reasonably necessary to obtain the information
necessary to protect against the threat to public safety; OR
(II) THE CHILD’S PARENT, GUARDIAN, OR CUSTODIAN
CONSENTS TO THE CUSTODIAL INTERROGATION OF THE CHILD WITHOUT THE
CHILD’S CONSULTATION WITH AN ATTORNEY.
(2) (i) Unless it is impossible, impracticable, or unsafe to do so, an
interrogation conducted under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be recorded.
(ii) In a jurisdiction that has adopted the use of body–worn digital
recording devices by law enforcement officers, the interrogation of a child may be recorded
using a body–worn digital recording device in a manner that is consistent with
departmental policies regarding the use of body–worn digital recording devices.
(iii) In a jurisdiction that has not adopted the use of body–worn
digital recording devices, the interrogation of a child may be recorded using other video and
audio recording technology in a manner that is consistent with any policies of the law
enforcement agency regarding the use of video and audio recording technology.
(iv) A child being interrogated under this subsection shall be
informed if the interrogation is being recorded.
(h) (1) There is a rebuttable presumption that a statement made by a child
during a custodial interrogation is inadmissible in a delinquency proceeding or a criminal
prosecution against that child if a law enforcement officer willfully failed to comply with

HOUSE BILL 622
the requirements of this section.
(2) The State may overcome the presumption by showing, by clear and
convincing evidence, that the statement was made knowingly, intelligently, and
voluntarily.
(3) This subsection may not be construed to render a statement by that
child inadmissible in a proceeding against another individual.
(i) The Office of the Public Defender shall:
(1) Develop and implement policies to provide guidance and instruction to
attorneys to meet the requirements of this section; and
(2) On or before October 1, 2022, publish on its website, or provide to law
enforcement on request, information on attorneys available to act as counsel to a child in
accordance with this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.